Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-901.1.
Criminal history and central registry check for placements of children.

Each local board and licensed child-placing agency shall obtain, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board, criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange and the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Central Criminal Records Exchange and the results of a search of the child abuse and neglect central registry of any individual with whom the local board or licensed child-placing agency is considering placing a child on an emergency, temporary or permanent basis, including the birth parent of a child in foster care placement, unless the birth parent has revoked an entrustment agreement pursuant to §

63.2-1223

or

63.2-1817

or a local board or birth parent revokes a placement agreement while legal custody remains with the parent, parents, or guardians pursuant to §

63.2-900

. The local board or licensed child-placing agency shall also obtain such background checks on all adult household members residing in the home of the individual with whom the child is to be placed pursuant to subsection B. Such state criminal records or registry search shall be at no cost to the individual. The local board or licensed child-placing agency shall pay for the national fingerprint criminal history record check or may require such individual to pay the cost of the fingerprinting or the national fingerprinting criminal history record check or both. In addition to the fees assessed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the designated state agency may assess a fee for responding to requests required by this section.

Background checks pursuant to this section require the following:

A sworn statement or affirmation disclosing whether or not the individual has a criminal conviction or is the subject of any pending criminal charges within or outside the Commonwealth and whether or not the individual has been the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth;

That the individual submit to fingerprinting and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the individual’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information. The local board or licensed child-placing agency shall inform the individual that he is entitled to obtain a copy of any background check report and to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any such report and obtain a prompt resolution before a final decision is made of the individual’s fitness to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children.The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an individual’s record or notification that no record exists, shall forward it to the designated state agency. The state agency shall, upon receipt of an individual’s record lacking disposition data, conduct research in whatever state and local recordkeeping systems are available in order to obtain complete data. The state agency shall report to the local board or licensed child-placing agency whether the individual meets the criteria for having responsibility for the safety and well-being of children based on whether or not the individual has ever been convicted of or is the subject of pending charges for any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

. Copies of any information received by a local board or licensed child-placing agency pursuant to this section shall be available to the state agency that regulates or operates such a child-placing agency but shall not be disseminated further; and

A search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect. In addition, a search of the child abuse and neglect registry maintained by any other state pursuant to the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248, in which a prospective parent or other adult in the home has resided in the preceding five years.

In emergency circumstances, each local board may obtain, from a criminal justice agency, criminal history record information from the Central Criminal Records Exchange and the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Virginia Criminal Information Network (VCIN) for the criminal records search authorized by this section. Within three days of placing a child, the local board shall require the individual for whom a criminal history record information check was requested to submit to fingerprinting and provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal record history information, pursuant to subsection B. The child shall be removed from the home immediately if any adult resident fails to provide such fingerprints and written permission to perform a criminal history record check when requested.

Any individual with whom the local board is considering placing a child on an emergency basis shall submit to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

and the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248 for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect. The search of the central registry must occur prior to emergency placement. Such central registry search shall be at no cost to the individual. Prior to emergency placement, the individual shall provide a written statement of affirmation disclosing whether he has ever been the subject of a founded case of child abuse or neglect within or outside the Commonwealth. Child-placing agencies shall not approve individuals with a founded complaint of child abuse as foster or adoptive parents.

The child-placing agency shall not approve a foster or adoptive home if any individual has been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or is the subject of a founded complaint of abuse or neglect as maintained in registries pursuant to §

63.2-1515

and 42 U.S.C.S. 16901 et seq. A child-placing agency may approve as a foster parent an applicant who has been convicted of not more than one misdemeanor as set out in §

18.2-57

, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, not involving the abuse, neglect, or moral turpitude of a minor, provided that 10 years have elapsed following the conviction.

A local board or child-placing agency may approve as a kinship foster care parent an applicant who has been convicted of the following offenses, provided that 10 years have elapsed from the date of the conviction and the local board or child-placing agency makes a specific finding that approving the kinship foster care placement would not adversely affect the safety and well-being of the child: (i) any offense set forth in clause (iv) of the definition of barrier crime in §

19.2-392.02

or (ii) any misdemeanor offense under §

18.2-80

,

18.2-81

,

18.2-83

,

18.2-87

,

18.2-87

.1, or

18.2-88

or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction.

Any individual participating in the Fostering Futures program, which allows local departments to continue to provide foster care services to individuals who are 18 years of age or older but have not reached 21 years of age, who is placed in a foster home shall be subject to the background check requirements set forth in subsection B. The results of such background check shall be used for the sole purpose of determining whether other children should be placed or remain in the same foster home as the individual subject to the background check. The results of the background check shall not be used to terminate or suspend the approval of the foster home pursuant to subsection E. For purposes of this subsection, “individual participating in the Fostering Futures program” means a person who is 18 years of age or older but has not reached 21 years of age and is receiving foster care services through the Fostering Futures program.

History.

2002, cc. 587, 606, § 63.1-56.01; 2005, c. 722; 2006, c. 558; 2007, cc. 606, 617, 623, 871; 2011, cc. 5, 156; 2012, c. 568; 2017, cc. 194, 809.

Cross references.

As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002 cc. 587 and 606, which are identical, enacted § 63.1-56.01, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, cc. 587 and 606 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2007, c. 871, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2007.” The act had no emergency clause. See Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 722 inserted subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 558, in subsection A, deleted “statewide” preceding “criminal history,” inserted “and the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Centeral Criminal Records Exchange” following “Central Criminal Records Exchange,” added the language beginning
“The local board or” and ending “national fingerprints criminal history record check or both,” substituted “a national fingerprint criminal history” for “the criminal history record information,” inserted “upon request” following “the local board or agency”; in subsection B, inserted “and the Federal Bureau of Investigation” following “Central Criminal Records Exchange” and added the language beginning “Within three days” and ending “history record check or both.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606, 617 and 623, are nearly identical, and inserted “unless the birth parent has revoked an entrustment agreement pursuant to §

63.2-1223

or

63.2-1817

or a local board or birth parent revokes a placement agreement while legal custody remains with the parent, parents, or guardians pursuant to §

63.2-900

” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2007 amendment by c. 871, effective April 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by cc. 5 and 156 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “child-placing agency shall also obtain” for “child-placing agency may also obtain” in the second sentence, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 568 substituted “agency shall pay” for “agency must pay” in the fourth sentence of subsection A, and added subsection F.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 194 added subsection G.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subdivision B 2, substituted “for any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

” for “set forth in §

63.2-1719

” in the last paragraph; in subsection E, substituted “been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

or is the subject of” for “a record of an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

or” in the first sentence and inserted “who has been” and “or any substantially similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction” in the second sentence; in subsection F, rewrote clauses (i) and (ii) which formerly read “(i) a felony conviction for possession of drugs as set out in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, but not including a felony conviction for possession of drugs with the intent to distribute; (ii) a misdemeanor conviction for arson as set out in Article 1 (§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2; or (iii) an equivalent offense in another state.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Best interests of child. —

It was in the best interests of a child under §

20-124.3

to remain in her current custodial arrangement as the evidence showed that the child had bonded well with her current foster family, there was a substantial risk that removing the child again from an established home would exacerbate, rather than mitigate, any developmental damage, there was an entrustment agreement with the current foster family, and the family indicated that they wished to proceed with the adoption process. Since there was currently a founded complaint of abuse against one of the petitioners, the department, pursuant to subsection E of §

63.2-901.1

, was not permitted to approve petitioners’ home as a foster or adoptive home. Welch v. Wise County Dep't of Soc. Servs., 84 Va. Cir. 245, 2012 Va. Cir. LEXIS 27 (Wise County Jan. 27, 2012).

§ 63.2-902.
Agreements with persons taking children; dispute resolution; appeals.

Every local board and licensed child-placing agency shall, with respect to each child placed by it in a foster home or children’s residential facility, enter into a written agreement contained in an approved foster care policy with the head of such home or facility, which agreement shall provide that the authorized representatives of the local board or agency shall have access at all times to such child and to the home or facility, and that the head of the home or facility will release custody of the child so placed to the authorized representatives of the local board or agency whenever, in the opinion of the local board or agency, or in the opinion of the Commissioner, it is in the best interests of the child.

Local boards and licensed child-placing agencies shall implement and publicize a dispute resolution process through which a foster parent may contest an alleged violation of the regulations governing the collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents. Prior to filing a complaint through such dispute resolution process, the foster parent shall contact the family services specialist assigned to the foster home, provide a detailed description of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of the regulations governing collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents, and attempt to resolve the dispute. Family services specialists shall respond within five business days and explain any corrective action to be taken in response to the foster parent’s complaint. If the foster parent and family services specialist are unable to resolve the complaint informally, the foster parent may file a written complaint through the dispute resolution process with the local board’s foster care supervisor or assigned designee. The complaint shall include a detailed description of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of the regulations governing collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents, along with any other information required by Department regulation. The foster care supervisor or assigned designee shall respond to the complaint in writing within five business days, setting forth all findings regarding the alleged violation and any corrective action to be taken.If the foster parent disagrees with the findings or corrective actions proposed by the foster care supervisor or assigned designee, the foster parent may appeal the decision to the local director by filing a written notice of appeal. The notice of appeal shall include a detailed description of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of the regulations governing collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents, a copy of the foster care supervisor or assigned designee’s findings and recommendations, and any other information required by Department regulation. The local director shall hold a meeting between all parties within seven business days to gather any information necessary to determine the validity of the alleged violation of the regulations governing collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents and the appropriateness of any recommendations for corrective action made by the family services specialist and foster care supervisor or assigned designee. A summary of the meeting shall be documented in writing by the family services specialist after approval by the foster care supervisor or assigned designee. Following such meeting and documentation, the local director shall issue to all parties written findings and, when applicable, recommendations for corrective action.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-243; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-206; 2002, c. 747; 2008, cc. 241, 308; 2019, c. 336.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 336, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to ensure collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents to be effective within 280 days of the enactment of this act. These regulations shall include a statement of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents, requirements for the provision of background, medical, and psychological information to foster parents for each child placed in their home, and requirements for notice to foster parents of any court hearings and scheduled meetings regarding a foster child placed in their care.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 241 and 308 are identical, and inserted “contained in an approved foster care policy” near the beginning of the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 336 designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 81.

§ 63.2-903.
Entrustment agreements; adoption.

Whenever a local board accepts custody of a child pursuant to an entrustment agreement entered into under the authority of §

63.2-900

, or a licensed child-placing agency accepts custody of a child pursuant to an entrustment agreement entered into under the authority of §

63.2-1817

, in the city or county juvenile and domestic relations district court a petition for approval of the entrustment agreement (i) shall be filed within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 89 days after the execution of an entrustment agreement for less than 90 days, if the child is not returned to his home within that period; (ii) shall be filed within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 30 days after the execution of an entrustment agreement for 90 days or longer or for an unspecified period of time, if such entrustment agreement does not provide for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child; and (iii) may be filed in the case of a permanent entrustment agreement which provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child.

For purposes of §§

63.2-900

,

63.2-1817

and this section, a parent who is less than 18 years of age shall be deemed fully competent and shall have legal capacity to execute a valid entrustment agreement, including an agreement that provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities, and shall be as fully bound thereby as if such parent had attained the age of 18 years. An entrustment agreement for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities shall be executed in writing and notarized. An entrustment agreement for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child shall be valid notwithstanding that it is not signed by the father of a child born out of wedlock if the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable, or if such father is given notice of the entrustment by registered or certified mail to his last known address and fails to object to the entrustment within 15 days of mailing of such notice. An affidavit of the mother that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided there is no other evidence that would refute such an affidavit. The absence of such an affidavit shall not be deemed evidence that the identity of the father is reasonably ascertainable. For purposes of determining whether the identity of the father is reasonably ascertainable, the standard of what is reasonable under the circumstances shall control, taking into account the relative interests of the child, the mother and the father.

An entrustment agreement for the termination of parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child shall be valid notwithstanding that it is not signed by the birth father of a child when such father has been convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

, subsection B of §

18.2-366

, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, and the child was conceived as a result of such violation.

A child may be placed for adoption by a licensed child-placing agency or a local board, in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-1221

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-73, 63-241; 1952, c. 409; 1960, c. 331; 1968, cc. 466, 578, 585, §§ 63.1-56, 63.1-204; 1972, c. 50; 1974, c. 620; 1975, cc. 248, 406; 1977, cc. 559, 562, 634, 645; 1978, cc. 730, 734, 735; 1981, c. 259; 1984, c. 734; 1985, cc. 18, 285; 1986, cc. 88, 281; 1988, c. 882; 1989, c. 647; 1991, c. 34; 1994, c. 865; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, cc. 889, 1028; 2000, c. 830; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 815; 2005, c. 890; 2007, cc. 606, 623.

Cross references.

For provision authorizing local board to accept and expend certain funds on behalf of children placed by or entrusted to it when no guardian has been appointed, see §

63.2-320

.

As to reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth for certain expenditures, see §

63.2-401

.

As to parental or agency consent for adoption, and exceptions to consent requirement, see §

63.2-1202

.

As to adoption assistance for adoption of children with special needs, see §

63.2-1300

et seq. As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241. As to approval of entrustment agreements by court, see § 16.1-277.01.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 815 inserted the present second sentence in subsection B and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted “or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction” in subsection C; and made a related change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and substituted “15 days” for “21 days” in the third sentence of subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978).

For discussion of statutory changes in child placement by the 1978 session of the General Assembly, see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 739 (1978).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-300. Checklist for Agency Adoption, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 7.

§ 63.2-904.
Investigation, visitation, and supervision of foster homes or independent living arrangement; removal of child.

Before placing or arranging for the placement of any such child in a foster home or independent living arrangement, a local board or licensed child-placing agency shall cause a careful study to be made to determine the suitability of such home or independent living arrangement, and after placement shall cause such home or independent living arrangement and child to be visited as often as necessary to protect the interests of such child. Home studies by local boards shall be conducted in accordance with the Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto developed by the Department.

Every local board or licensed child-placing agency that places a child in a foster home or independent living arrangement shall maintain such supervision over such home or independent living arrangement as shall be required by the standards and policies established by the Board.

Whenever any child placed by a local board or licensed child-placing agency and still under its control or supervision is subject, in the home in which he is placed, to unwholesome influences or to neglect or mistreatment, or whenever the Commissioner shall so order, such local board or agency shall cause the child to be removed from such home and shall make for him such arrangements as may be approved by the Commissioner. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Commissioner shall have the authority to place, remove, or direct the placement or removal of any child who is under the supervision and control of a local board or licensed child-placing agency. Pursuant to such authority, the Commissioner shall remove or direct the removal of any child placed by a local board or licensed child-placing agency in a foster home or children’s residential facility that fails to comply with any state or federal requirements intended to protect the child’s health, safety, or well-being.

Consistent with the reasonable and prudent parent standard defined in 42 U.S.C. § 675(10)(A), caregivers for children in foster care shall support normalcy for such children. The Board shall adopt regulations to assist local boards and licensed child-placing agencies in carrying out practices that support careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety, and best interest of the child while at the same time encouraging his emotional and developmental growth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-242, 63-248; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-205, 63.1-211; 1989, c. 307; 2002, c. 747; 2008, cc. 475, 483; 2016, c. 631; 2017, c. 193; 2019, cc. 336, 446.

Cross references.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 193, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services is authorized to amend or update its Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto when necessary to improve the process of adoptive and foster placements, provided such amendments or updates do not lessen the requirements of the home study process.”

Acts 2019, c. 336, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to ensure collaboration, communication, access, and transparency between the local boards and licensed child-placing agencies and foster parents to be effective within 280 days of the enactment of this act. These regulations shall include a statement of the rights and responsibilities of foster parents, requirements for the provision of background, medical, and psychological information to foster parents for each child placed in their home, and requirements for notice to foster parents of any court hearings and scheduled meetings regarding a foster child placed in their care.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are identical, and substituted “independent living arrangement” for “independent living placement” and “independent placement” throughout this section.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631 added subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 193 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 336 and 446 are identical, and added the second and third sentences in subsection C.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

§ 63.2-904.1.
Intervention by Commissioner; corrective action plans; assumption of temporary control.

The Commissioner shall have the authority to create and enforce a corrective action plan for any local board that, in the Commissioner’s discretion, (i) fails to provide foster care services or make placement and removal decisions in accordance with this title or Board regulations or (ii) takes any action or fails to act in a manner that poses a substantial risk to the health, safety, or well-being of any child under its supervision and control. The corrective action plan shall (a) include specific objectives that the local board must meet in order to comply with applicable laws and regulations and ensure the health, safety, and well-being of all children in its supervision and control and (b) set the date by which such objectives must be completed, which shall not extend beyond 90 days after implementation of the corrective action plan unless the Commissioner determines that the objectives of the corrective action plan cannot be reasonably accomplished within such time frame. During the time the corrective action plan is in effect, the Commissioner may direct Department staff to provide assistance to the local board, monitor its progress in meeting the objectives stated in the plan, and take any measures necessary to protect the health, safety, and well-being of children in the local board’s supervision and control. The Commissioner shall provide regular updates to the chairman of the Board, chairman of the local board, and local director regarding the local board’s progress in meeting the objectives of the corrective action plan.Prior to implementing a corrective action plan, the Commissioner shall provide written notice of his intent to implement the corrective action plan and the reasons for which such plan was developed to the chairman of the Board, chairman of the local board, and local director. Upon request by the chairman of the Board, chairman of the local board, or local director, the Commissioner shall hold a hearing to determine whether a corrective action plan is appropriate.

If the local board fails to timely comply with the corrective action plan, the Commissioner shall have the authority to temporarily assume control over all or part of the local board’s foster care services and associated funds. Upon assuming such control, the Commissioner may utilize Department staff or contract with private entities to provide foster care services in the locality served by the local board and manage funds appropriated for such purposes. For any period during which a local board is under the Commissioner’s control, the Commissioner shall work with the local board and local director to make any adjustments necessary to facilitate the local board’s resumption of control over its foster care services and funds. The Commissioner shall remit control of such foster care services and funds to the local board upon determining that the local board has made all adjustments necessary to ensure that foster care services are provided in compliance with state and federal law and regulations and in a manner that adequately protects the health, safety, and well-being of all children in its supervision and control.

Whenever the Commissioner assumes temporary control over a local board’s foster care services and funds pursuant to this section, the amount of local funding made available for such services shall remain equal to or greater than the amounts available immediately prior to the Commissioner’s assumption of temporary control. Additionally, the locality in which the local board is located shall be required to pay the local share of any costs associated with any services necessary to align the local board’s foster care services with state and federal laws and regulations.

History.

2019, c. 446.

§ 63.2-904.2.
Complaint system.

The Commissioner shall establish and maintain mechanisms to receive reports and complaints from foster parents, interested stakeholders, and other citizens of the Commonwealth regarding violations of laws or regulations applicable to foster care and any other matters affecting the health, safety, or well-being of children in foster care. Such mechanisms shall include establishing a statewide, toll-free hotline to be administered by the Department; publicizing the existence of such hotline; and enhancing electronic communication with the Department for the receipt of reports or complaints.

Reports and complaints received through the foster care hotline or other mechanisms established pursuant to this section shall be investigated pursuant to Board regulations. All information received or maintained by the Department in connection with such reports, complaints, or investigations shall be confidential and not subject to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), except that such information may be relayed and used on a confidential basis pursuant to Board regulations for the purposes of investigation and to protect the health, safety, and well-being of children in foster care.

History.

2019, c. 446.

§ 63.2-905.
Foster care services.

Foster care services are the provision of a full range of casework, treatment, and community services, including but not limited to independent living services, for a planned period of time to a child who is abused or neglected as defined in §

63.2-100

or in need of services as defined in § 16.1-228 and his family when the child (i) has been identified as needing services to prevent or eliminate the need for foster care placement, (ii) has been placed through an agreement between the local board or the public agency designated by the community policy and management team and the parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians, (iii) has been committed or entrusted to a local board or licensed child placing agency, or (iv) is living with a relative participating in the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program set forth in §

63.2-1305

and developed consistent with 42 U.S.C. § 673 or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance Program set forth in §

63.2-1306

. Foster care services also include the provision and restoration of independent living services to a person who is over the age of 18 years but who has not yet reached the age of 21 years, in accordance with §

63.2-905.1

.

History.

1977, cc. 562, 634, § 63.1-55.8; 1986, c. 281; 1994, c. 865; 2002, c. 747; 2008, cc. 475, 483; 2013, c. 5; 2018, cc. 769, 770; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of a state pool of funds to be allocated to community policy and management teams under the Children’s Services Act, see §

2.2-5211

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, cl. 2 provides: “The Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. Such regulations shall include conditions for establishing a kinship guardianship, requirements for the development and amendment of a kinship guardianship assistance agreement, and circumstances that qualify a prospective kinship guardian for exemption from the relative foster home approval process. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are identical, and inserted “including but not limited to independent living services” near the beginning of this section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 5 added the second sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 769 and 770 are identical, and inserted “or (iv) is living with a relative participating in the Kinship Guardianship Assistance program set forth in §

63.2-1305

and developed consistent with 42 U.S.C. § 673” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “Federal-Funded” and “or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program pursuant to §

63.2-1306

” in clause (iv).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Mandated mental health services for children. —

This section does not mandate that mental health services be provided; it merely defines the term foster care services. The Comprehensive Services Act (CSA) mandates the provision of such foster care services by the state and locality to prevent foster care placements when the child receiving the services is abused and neglected as defined in §

63.2-100

, or is in need of services as defined in § 16.1-228. Statutory and constitutional provisions require mandated services pursuant to CSA to be provided to eligible children without their parents having to relinquish custody to local service agencies. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable William H. Fralin, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 05-095 (12/6/06).